src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
Class 7 according to Feist 154-155
## i-stems
* LEXICON N_HOQPPI  hõʹppi:hõʹppi
* LEXICON NMN_HOQPPI  hõʹppi:hõʹppi
* Yaml: **hoppi**
* There are several stem types
* hõʹppi:hõʹppi

* :%^I2J VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-

* LEXICON N_VUYPPPAI  vuâppai:vuâpˈp
* LEXICON NMN_VUYPPPAI  vuâppai:vuâpˈp
* Yaml: **vuappai**
* There are several stem types
* :%>%{ʼØ%}j PL-OBL ;  vuâpˈpji 2019-09-20
* :%>%{ʼØ%}j VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-

* LEXICON N_SHUOABYRJ  šuåbârj:šuåbâr
* LEXICON NMN_SHUOABYRJ  šuåbârj:šuåbâr
* Yaml: **shuabarj**

* :%>ǥ VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-

* LEXICON N_OAOAUM  ååum:å%^1VOWumm
* LEXICON NMN_OAOAUM  ååum:å%^1VOWumm
* Yaml: **N-aaum**
* There are several stem types
*     :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-NOM ;  
*	:a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;  
*	  :%>%{ʼØ%}j%>a SG-ILL ;  
*  :a SG-LOC ;  
*  :a SG-COM_IN ;  
* :%>%{ʼØ%}je ESS/PAR ;  
*    :a PL-OBL ;  
* :%>%{ʼØ%}j VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-

* LEXICON N_CHUYR  čuâr:čuõrˈr
* LEXICON NMN_CHUYR  čuâr:čuõrˈr
* Yaml: **N-chuar**
* There are several stem types
čuâr
čuâras
čuâraš
čuõrˈru
čuâran
čuõrˈrui
* :%^VOWLower%>s VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWLower%>š VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWLower%>ǥ VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-

* LEXICON N_KAAMMI  kaammi:kaamm
* LEXICON NMN_KAAMMI  kaammi:kaamm
* Yaml: **piannai**
* There are several stem types
kaammi
käʹmme
kaammjen
käʹmmi

* LEXICON N_PIYNNAI  piânnai:piânˈn
* LEXICON NMN_PIYNNAI  piânnai:piânˈn
* Yaml: **piannai**
* There are several stem types
piânnai
pieʹnˈne
piânnʼjen
pieʹnˈn-
pieʹnˈnʼji Correction by Satu 2015-08-12
piânˈnʼji

* :ǥ VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>%{ʼØ%}j VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-

Class 8 according to Feist 155-157

Class 9 according to Feist 158
* LEXICON N_MEERSAZH  säʹmmlaž:säʹmml
* Yaml: **A-saemmlazh**
säʹmmlaž:säʹmmlaž
* : VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-

Diminutive derivations

* LEXICON N_1Â_DIMK_YZH  muõrâž:muõr
(2009: 306)
* muõrâž:muõr
* Yaml: **N-muorazh**

* LEXICON N_MUORYZH  muõrâž:muõr
(2009: 306)
* muõrâž:muõr
* Yaml: **N-muorazh**

* LEXICON N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL  paapp
* :âž SG-NOM ;		 paappâž
* :že SG-ILL ;	 paappže
* :že ESS/PAR ;	 	 paappžen

* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG: SG-LOC-PX ;  muõrstes
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:âž%>am K;   Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>ž%>amâ K;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:âž%>amâ K;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* LEXICON N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL_PL  paapp
* :že ESS/PAR ;	 	 paappžen

* LEXICON N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL    paaʹpp-
* :%>e SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	 paaʹppe
* :%>e SG-LOC ;	 paaʹppest
* :%>e SG-COM_IN ;	     paaʹppein
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG: SG-COM_IN ;	     paaʹppin

* :%>e PL-NOM ;	 paaʹppe
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>e PL-OBL ;	     paaʹppei Merja differentiates from regular pl
*  PL-OBL ;	     paaʹppi

* : SG-LOC-PX ;  muõʹrstes
* :%>e PL-NOM ;    paaʹppe
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>e PL-OBL ;        paaʹppei Merja differentiates from regular pl
*  PL-OBL ;        paaʹppi

* LEXICON N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL  paapp-
* :âž SG-NOM ;		 paappâž
* :%>že SG-ILL ;	 paappže
* :%>že ESS/PAR ;	 	 paappžen

* +Use/NGminip+Use/NGminip+Use/NG: SG-LOC-PX ;  muõrstes

* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:âž%>am K;   Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>ž%>amâ K;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:âž%>amâ K;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* LEXICON N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL    kuuʹzz-
* :%>e SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	 paaʹzze
* :%>e SG-LOC ;	 paaʹzzest
* :%>e SG-COM_IN ;	     paaʹzzein
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG: SG-COM_IN ;	     paaʹzzin
* :%>e PL-NOM ;	 paaʹzze
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>e PL-OBL ;	     paaʹzzei Merja differentiates from regular pl
*  PL-OBL ;	     paaʹzzi
* +Use/NGminip+Use/SpellNoSugg: SG-LOC-PX ;  kuuʹzzstes

* : SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;  kuʹzstes

* Yaml: **N-muorazh**

* : HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ;  säʹmmlõõžž- Sg_Loc_PxSg1
* :%^PAL HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ;  säʹmmlõõʹžž- Sg_Loc_PxSg1
* :%^VV2V%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;  säʹmmlõʹž-
* :%^VV2V%^CC2CAllegro SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;  säʹmmlõž-

* LEXICON N_PRE-PEESSAZH  puälaž:puäl

* LEXICON N_PEESSAZH  piissuž:pẹẹss
This is only a partial paradigm
* LEXICON NMN_PEESSAZH  piissuž:pẹẹss
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:ažam K;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>žamâ K;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:ažamâ K;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* LEXICON N_PIISSUZH  piissuž:piiss
(2009: 310)
* piissuž:piiss
* Yaml: **N-piissuzh**

* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:ožam K;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>žamâ K;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:ožamâ K;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* LEXICON N_KUYLAZH  kuâlaž:kuâl
* kuâlaž:kuâl
* Yaml: **N-kualazh**
kuâla, kuâlže
* : LOAOADDAZH-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  This should go to each stem type ERROR

* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:ažam K;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>žamâ K;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/Orth+Err/GenreLeudd+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:ažamâ K;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* LEXICON N_KUYLAZH_PL  kuâla:kuâl

* LEXICON N_UUQREZH  uuʹrež:uuʹr
* Yaml: **N-uurezh**

* LEXICON N_JEAQKHKHKHAAZH  jeäʹǩǩääž:jeäʹǩˈǩ
* Yaml: **N-jeakkeaeazh**

* Yaml: **N-kualazh**

* LEXICON NMN_JIQLSSI  Jiʹlssi:Jiʹlssi
Is this correct 2015-09-11

* LEXICON NMN_OAQLGA  Ååʹlga:Ååʹlg
Is this correct 2015-09-11

* LEXICON NMN_SINIDA  Sinida:Sinid
Is this correct 2015-09-11
Is this correct 2015-09-11

* LEXICON N_KUUQMPEZH  
* kuuʹmpež:kuuʹmp
* Yaml: **N-kuumpezh**

* LEXICON N_OOUMAZH  ooumaž:o%^1VOWumm
is for nouns with *-ust* +Sg+Loc; *e* +Sg+Ill;
X2 no gradation; no lowering no raising
N_GEN1-ILLEX1-LOCE-NOM1X1
* Yaml: **N-ooumazh**
* There are several stem types 
* ooumaž:ooum

Class 10 according to Feist 160-161
## neǩ-stem
* LEXICON N_KAADHNEKH  kaađneǩ:kaađnẹ%^1VOWk
* LEXICON NMN_KAADHNEKH  kaađneǩ:kaađnẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}k
* Yaml: **N-kaadhnekj, N-chaustok**
Ǩiõllkaʹlddi. 2017-04-04-05
Ǩiõllkaʹlddi. 2017-04-04-05
kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Nom **lincense vessel/suitsutusastia**
* *kaađnẹ%^1VOWk%^PALE%^PALK*
* *kaađne0ǩ00*
* :%{XC%}%^PAL%^C2CC%^PALK%>e ESS/PAR ;  kaađneʹǩǩe- 
* +Err/Orth-k-kh:%{XC%}%^PAL%^C2CC%>e ESS/PAR ;  kaađneʹkke- 
* :%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^C2CC%^PALK SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  kaađneeʹǩǩ
* +Err/Orth-k-kh:%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^C2CC SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  kaađneeʹkk
kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Gen 
* *kaađnẹ%^1VOWǩ%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^C2CC%^PALK*
* *kaađneeʹǩǩ0000*
* :%{XC%}%^PALNo%^C2CC%>a SG-ILL ;  kaađnẹkka
* :%{XC%}%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^C2CC%^PALK SG-COM_IN ;  kaađniiʹǩǩin
* *kaađnẹ%^1VOW0ǩ%{XC%}%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^C2CC%^PALK%>in*
* *kaađniiʹǩǩ00000%>in*
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^C2CC%^PALK SG-COM_IN ;  kaađneeʹǩǩin
* :%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^C2CC%^PALK PL-NOM ;  kaađneeʹǩǩ

* Yaml: **N-kaadhnekj, N-chaustok**

* LEXICON N_KARIES  karies:kariẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}s
* LEXICON NMN_KARIES  karies:kariẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}s
* similar to **N-kaadhnekj, N-chaustok**
Ǩiõllkaʹlddi. 2017-04-04-05
karies+N+Sg+Nom **caries/hammasmätä**
* *kariẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}s*
* *karie00s*
* :%{XC%}%^PAL%^C2CC%>e ESS/PAR ;  kaađneʹǩǩe- 
* :%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^K2GG SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  kaađneeʹǩǩ
* :%{XC%}%^PALNo%^C2CC%>a SG-ILL ;  kaađnẹkka
* :%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^K2GG PL-NOM ;  karieeʹzz

Sort of like 10
* LEXICON NMN_VUYSPPOAQD  vuâsppåʹd:vuâsppå%^1VOWd
* Yaml: **N-kaadhnekj, N-chaustok**
Ǩiõllkaʹlddi. 2017-04-04-05
vuâsppåʹd+N+Sg+Nom **Lord/Herra**
* *vuâsppå%^1VOW0d%^PAL*
* *vuâsppå0ʹd0*
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ;  Vuâsppååʹde- 
* +Err/Orth:%{XC%}%^PAL%^C2CC%>e ESS/PAR ;  kaađneʹǩǩe- 
* :%^V2VV%^PAL SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  Vuâsppååʹd
* +Err/Orth:%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^C2CC SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  Vuâsppååʹdd
vuâsppåʹd+N+Sg+Gen 
* *vuâsppå%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}d%^V2VV%^PAL*
* *vuâsppååʹd00*
* :%^V2VV%>a SG-ILL ;  Vuâsppååda
* +Err/Orth:%{XC%}%^PALNo%^C2CC%>a SG-ILL ;  kaađnekka
* *vuâsppå%^1VOW0d%{XC%}%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^C2CC%>in*
* *vuâsppooʹdd0000%>in*
* :%^V2VV%^PAL PL-NOM ;  vuâsppååʹd
* :%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL PL-OBL ;  vuâsppooʹd

* LEXICON NMN_TEAPPNEQD  Teäppneʹd:Teäpˈpnẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}d
* Yaml: 
Teäppneʹd
* :%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ;  Teäppneʹden 
* :%^V2VV%^PAL SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  Teäppneeʹd
* :%^V2VV%>a SG-ILL ;  Teäppnẹẹda
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%>e SG-LOC ;  Teäppneeʹdest
* :%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL SG-COM_IN ;  Teäppniiʹdin
* +Err/Orth:%{XC%}%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^C2CC SG-COM_IN ;  Teäppniiʹddin
* :%^V2VV%^PAL PL-NOM ;  Teäppneeʹd
* :%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL PL-OBL ;  Teäppniiʹd-

Class 11 according to Feist 162
* LEXICON N_VISKKYD  viskkâd:viskk

* LEXICON N_MOASHSHAD  måššad:måšš
inflection_type="?"vuäʹllad+N:vuäʹlˈl (cf. also A-ORD_NEELLJAD)

* LEXICON N_AQKHKHED  âʹǩǩed:âʹǩǩ

Class 12 Feist 163

### Noun phrase heads
### Pl

### Number and case tags

Used with words like juurd: jurddǥatta

## POSSESSIVE DECLENSION
### HatY-STEM-PX
* +Err/GenreLeudd:â SG-NOM ;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* +Err/GenreLeudd:â SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/GenreLeudd:â SG-COM_N ;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* +Err/GenreLeudd:â SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/GenreLeudd:â SG-COM_N ;  Leudd 2018-09-20

### A-STEM-PX

* +Err/GenreLeudd:a SG-NOM ;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* +Err/GenreLeudd:a SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/GenreLeudd:a SG-COM_N ;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* : N2A_REAEB3H3HAI ;      N»A

### E-STEM-PX

* +Err/GenreLeudd:e SG-NOM ;  Leudd 2018-09-20

* +Err/GenreLeudd:e SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;  Leudd 2018-09-20
* +Err/GenreLeudd:e SG-COM_N ;  Leudd 2018-09-20

### LOAOADDAZH-STEM-PX

* LEXICON LOAOADDAZH-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL  needs checking

### VOONYS-STEM-PX
* LEXICON VOONYS-STEM-PX  võnns-

* LEXICON VOONYS-STEM-PX-NO-DER  võnns-

* LEXICON VOONYS-STEM-PX-NO-DER-WITHOUT-PAL  võnns-

* LEXICON VOONYS-STEM-PX-NO-DER-WITH-PAL  võnns-

* LEXICON VOONYS-STEM-PX_PL  võnns-
* VOONYS-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  essive

* LEXICON VOONYS-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL  needs checking

* LEXICON N-ALLEGRO_ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM  This is for Allegro forms

## Adjectives -- to be moved

### Vowel-final stem for PX

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
